New York, session 2025-2026, S1613.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this act, the following 2 terms shall have the following meanings: 3 1. "Harriman campus" means the W. Averell Harriman state office build- 4 ing campus located in Albany, New York. 5 2. "Wadsworth project" means the New York state life sciences public 6 health laboratory project on an approximately 27-acre site on the south- 7 eastern portion of the Harriman campus. 8 § 2. Mixed-use property at Harriman campus. 1. At least 7 acres of 9 surface parking or underutilized contiguous space within the Wadsworth 10 project site shall be set aside for commercial and retail development 11 until the completion of the master plan pursuant to section three of 12 this act. Empire state development corporation, in conjunction with the 13 office of general services, shall conduct a development study to develop 14 such set aside area within the Wadsworth project site into mixed-use 15 commercial and residential property. 16 2. Empire state development corporation, in conjunction with the 17 office of general services, shall complete and publish the development 18 study conducted under subdivision one of this section, no later than 180 19 days after the effective date of this act, provided that it shall 20 publish a draft study for public review and comment for a minimum of 45 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04260-03-5 S. 1613--A 2 1 days prior to publishing the final development study, which shall 2 respond to substantive comments raised during such public comment peri- 3 od. 4 § 3. Redesign of Harriman campus. 1. Empire state development corpo- 5 ration, in conjunction with the office of general services, shall create 6 a master plan for a redesign of the Harriman campus. Such a plan shall 7 include but not be limited to: (a) the identification of sites on the 8 Harriman campus for mixed-use commercial and retail development; (b) the 9 repurposing or redesign of portions of the ring road surrounding the 10 campus; (c) an analysis of parking needs in surface lots; and (d) the 11 infrastructure needed to support the Wadsworth Project and the mixed-use 12 commercial and retail development pursuant to section two of this act. 13 2. The master plan created under subdivision one of this section shall 14 prioritize: (a) the integration and connectivity of the Harriman campus 15 with surrounding neighborhoods in the city of Albany; (b) the develop- 16 ment of workforce and low-to-middle-income housing; and (c) the develop- 17 ment of infrastructure needed to further the utilization of multi-modal 18 transportation. 19 3. Empire state development corporation, in conjunction with the 20 office of general services, shall complete and publish the master plan 21 created under subdivision one of this section no later than one year 22 after the effective date of this act, provided that it shall publish a 23 draft plan for public review and comment for a minimum of 45 days prior 24 to publishing the finalized master plan, which shall respond to substan- 25 tive comments raised during such public comment period. 26 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.